Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-1406
Employee; provide written statement;
contents.

At an employer's request, an employee, acting as
a volunteer emergency responder, who is absent from or reports late to his
or her place of employment in order to respond to an emergency shall provide
his or her employer, within seven days of such request, a written statement
signed by the individual in charge of the department
or another individual authorized to act for such individual that includes
the following: The fact that the employee responded to an emergency; the date
and time of the emergency; and the date and time such employee completed his
or her volunteer emergency activities.

Laws 2008, LB1096, § 9;

Laws 2012, LB1005, § 3.